Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB146.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.760 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Each Commonwealth's attorney shall, during the calendar year 1977 and through
June 30, 1978, be entitled to at least the number of assistant Commonwealth's
attorney positions, stenographic, secretarial, and clerical staff positions, and
investigative and other personnel positions, which he had or was entitled to at the
number and salary level in effect on December 1, 1976.
(2) ]The number of assistant Commonwealth's attorney positions, stenographic,
secretarial, and clerical staff positions, and investigative and other personnel
positions, shall be based on real need to be determined with the advice and consent
of the Prosecutors Advisory Council.
(2)[(3)] All assistant Commonwealth's attorneys shall be licensed practicing attorneys.
The full-time assistant Commonwealth's attorneys shall not be allowed to engage in
the private practice of law.
(3)[(4)] All salaries paid to personnel appointed under this section[hereunder] shall be
paid from the State Treasury. The salaries shall be commensurate with the
appointee's education, experience, training, and responsibility, and be based upon
the guidelines established by the Prosecutors Advisory Council, which guidelines
shall be comparable with the classification and compensation plan for comparable
positions maintained by the state Personnel Cabinet, pursuant to KRS 64.640.
(4)[(5)] The fiscal court, consolidated local government, or urban-county government
in the county or counties that comprise the judicial circuit shall be responsible for
providing the office of the Commonwealth's attorney with an adequate grand jury
room and witness rooms.
(5)[(6)] (a) Each Commonwealth's attorney shall be authorized to employ
individually or jointly with one (1) or more other Commonwealth's attorneys
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 896
at least one (1) victim advocate to [counsel and ]assist crime victims as
defined in KRS 421.500.
(b) 1. An individual employed as a victim advocate shall be a person who by a
combination of education, professional qualification, training, and
experience is qualified to perform the duties of this position. The victim
advocate shall be an individual at least eighteen (18) years of age, of
good moral character,[ with at least two (2) years of experience working
in the human services field or court system in a position requiring
professional contact with children or adults,] who has:
a.[1.] Received a bachelor's[baccalaureate] degree[ in social work,
sociology, psychology, guidance and counseling, education,
religion, criminal justice, or other human service field]; or
b.[2.] Received a high school diploma or equivalency certificate[,] and[,]
[in addition to the experience required in this subsection,] has at
least two (2)[four (4)] years' experience providing direct services,
support, counseling, or advocacy to individuals in the
community[working in the human services field or court system].
2. The Office of Victims Advocacy in the Office of the Attorney General
shall provide training to individuals employed as victim advocates in
the following:
a. The role of the system-based advocate;
b. The unauthorized practice of law;
c. Relevant statutes encompassing victim-based crimes;
d. Constitutional and statutory rights of crime victims; and
e. Best practices.
3. An individual employed as a victim advocate shall enroll in the
training described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph no later than
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 896
thirty (30) days from the date of the individual's hire.
(c) Each Commonwealth's attorney who employs an individual to serve as a
victim advocate shall develop a written job description which describes the
duties of the position and shall ensure the victim advocate completes training
relating to the appropriate intervention with crime victims, including victims
of domestic violence and victims of elder abuse, neglect, or exploitation or
other crimes against the elderly. Each victim advocate shall perform those
duties necessary to ensure[insure] compliance with the crime victim's bill of
rights contained in KRS 421.500 to 421.530.
(d) A[No] victim advocate shall not engage in:
1. Political activities while in the course of performing his or her duties as
victim advocate; or
2. The unlawful practice of law as defined in KRS 524.130.
(e) The creation and funding of any new personnel position shall be reviewed and
approved by the Prosecutors Advisory Council.
Section 2. KRS 69.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each county attorney may employ individually or jointly with one (1) or more other
county attorneys at least one (1) victim advocate to [counsel and ]assist crime
victims as defined in KRS 421.500.
(2) (a) An individual employed as a victim advocate shall be a person who by a
combination of education, professional qualification, training, and experience
is qualified to perform the duties of this position. The victim advocate shall be
an individual at least eighteen (18) years of age, of good moral character,[
with at least two (2) years of experience working in the human services field
or court system in a position requiring professional contact with children or
adults,] who has:
1.[(a)] Received a bachelor's[baccalaureate] degree[ in social work,
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 896
sociology, psychology, guidance and counseling, education, religion,
criminal justice, or other human service field]; or
2.[(b)] Received a high school diploma or equivalency certificate[,] and[,
in addition to the experience required in this subsection,] has at least two
(2)[four (4)] years' experience providing direct services, support,
counseling, or advocacy to individuals in the community [working in
the human services field or court system].
(b) The Office of Victims Advocacy in the Office of the Attorney General shall
provide training to individuals employed as victim advocates in the
following:
1. The role of the system-based advocate;
2. The unauthorized practice of law;
3. Relevant statutes encompassing victim-based crimes;
4. Constitutional and statutory rights of crime victims; and
5. Best practices.
(c) An individual employed as a victim advocate shall enroll in the training
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection no later than thirty (30) days
from the date of the individual's hire.
(3) Each county attorney who employs an individual to serve as a victim advocate shall
develop a written job description which describes the duties of the position and
shall ensure the victim advocate completes training relating to the appropriate
intervention with crime victims, including victims of domestic violence and elder
abuse, neglect, and exploitation and other crimes against the elderly. Each victim
advocate shall perform those duties necessary to ensure[insure] compliance with
the crime victim's bill of rights contained in KRS 421.500 to 421.530.
(4) A[No] victim advocate shall not engage in:
(a) Political activities while in the course of performing duties as victim
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 896
advocate; or
(b) The unlawful practice of law as defined in KRS 524.130.
(5) The creation and funding of any new personnel position shall be reviewed and
approved by the Prosecutors Advisory Council.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 12/31/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed